src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-3-kîskiswîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - kîskiswîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kikîskisotin # I play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nikîskiswâw # I play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikîskison # you play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kikîskiswâw # you play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswîw # he/she plays another/others
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [kîskisokow, kîskisok] # another/others play him/her

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-kîskisotân # as I play you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-kîskiswak # as I play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kîskisoyan # as you play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kîskiswat # as you play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskiswât # as he/she plays another/others
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kîskisokot # as another/others play him/her

      # Imp
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: kîskison # (you) play me now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: kîskis # (you) play him/her now
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kikîskisotin # I play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nikîskiswâw # I play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kikîskisotinâwâw # I play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nikîskiswâwak # I play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nikîskisomâwa # I play another/others

      # 2Sg
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikîskison # you play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kikîskiswâw # you play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikîskisonân # you play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikîskiswâwak # you play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomâwa # you play another/others

      # 3Sg
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikîskison # you play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kikîskisok # he/she plays you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikîskisonân # you play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kikîskisokonaw # he/she plays you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kikîskisokowâw # he/she plays you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikîskiswâwak # you play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomâwa # you play another/others
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomîw # he/she plays yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kikîskisotinân # we play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nikîskiswânân # we play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kikîskisotinân # we play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nikîskiswânânak # we play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nikîskisomânâna # we play another/others

      # 12Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kikîskiswânaw # we and you play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kikîskiswânawak # we and you play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomânawa # we and you play another/others

      # 2Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kikîskisonâwâw # you all play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kikîskiswâwâw # you all play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kikîskisonân # you all play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kikîskiswâwâwak # you all play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomâwâwa # you all play another/others

      # 3Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nikîskisokwak # they play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kikîskisokwak # they play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nikîskisokonânak # they play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kikîskisokonawak # they play you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kikîskisokowâwak # they play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswîwak # they play another/others
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomîwak # they play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nikîskisokothiwa # another/others play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kikîskisokothiwa # another/others play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [kîskisokow, kîskisok] # another/others play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nikîskisokonâna # another/others play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kikîskisokonawa # another/others play you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kikîskisokowâwa # another/others play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [kîskisokowak, kîskisokwak] # another/others play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswîthiwa # another/others play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokothiwa # yet another/others play another/others

      # X
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nikîskisokawin # someone plays me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kikîskisokawin # someone plays you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: kîskiswâw # someone plays him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nikîskisokawinân # someone plays us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kikîskisokawinaw, kikîskisokawinânaw] # someone plays you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kikîskisokawinâwâw # someone plays you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: kîskiswâwak # someone plays them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswâthiwa # someone plays another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: nikîskisokon
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kikîskisokon
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: kîskisokow
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: nikîskisokonân
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kikîskisokonaw
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kikîskisokowâw
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: kîskisokowak
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokothiwa
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-kîskisotân # as I play you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-kîskiswak # as I play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-kîskisotakwâw # as I play you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-kîskiswakwâw # as I play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-kîskiswaki # as I play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomak # as I play another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kîskisoyan # as you play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kîskiswat # as you play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kîskisoyâhk # as you play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kîskiswacik # as you play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomat # as you play another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kîskisoyan # as you play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-kîskisosk # as he/she plays you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kîskisoyâhk # as you play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-kîskisokoyâhk # as he/she plays us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisoyamiht # as he/she plays us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-kîskisokoyahk # as he/she plays you and us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisotahk # as he/she plays you and u
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-kîskisokoyîk # as he/she plays you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisotîk # as he/she plays you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kîskiswacik # as you play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomat # as you play another/others
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomât # as he/she plays yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-kîskisotâhk # as we play you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-kîskiswâyâhk # as we play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kîskiswakiht # as we play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-kîskisotâhk # as we play you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-kîskiswâyâhkwâw # as we play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kîskiswakihcik # as we play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomâyâhk # as we play another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-kîskiswâyahk # as we and you play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kîskiswahk # as we and you play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-kîskiswâyahkwâw # as we and you play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kîskiswahkwâw # as we and you play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomâyahk # as we and you play another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-kîskisoyîk # as you all play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-kîskiswâyîk # as you all play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-kîskisoyâhk # as you all play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-kîskiswâyîkwâw # as you all play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kîskiswâyîkok # as you all play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomâyîk # as you all play another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-kîskisotwâw, î-kîskisocik] # as they play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kîskisoskwâw # as they play you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kîskisokoyâhkwâw # as they play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisoyamihcik # as they play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kîskisokoyahkwâw # as they play you and us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisotahkwâw # as they play you and us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kîskisokoyîkwâw # as they play you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-kîskisotîkwâw # as they play you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskiswâcik # as they play another/others
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomâcik # as they play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kîskisomit # as another/others play me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kîskisomisk # as another/others play you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kîskisokot # as another/others play him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kîskisokoyâhk # as another/others play us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kîskisokoyahk # as another/others play you and us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kîskisokoyîk # as another/others play you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kîskisokocik # as another/others play them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kîskiswâthit # as another/others play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisokothit # as yet another/others play another/others

      # X
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kîskisokawiyân # as someone plays me
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kîskisokawiyan # as someone plays you
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kîskisoht # as someone plays him/her
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kîskisokawiyâhk # as someone plays us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kîskisokawiyahk # as someone plays you and us
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kîskisokawiyîk # as someone plays you all
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kîskisohcik # as someone plays them
      PV/î+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kîskisomiht # as someone plays another/others
